Wisconsin, session 2025, AB367.
do enact as follows:AB367,11Section 1. 103.023 of the statutes is created to read:AB367,2,92103.023 Hours of labor and recordkeeping; minor league baseball 3players. (1) In promulgating rules under s. 103.02 classifying periods of time into 4periods to be paid for at regular rates and periods to be paid for at the rate of at least 5one and one-half times the regular rates, the department shall exempt from the 6application of those rules an individual who has entered into a contract to play 7baseball at the minor league level and who is compensated pursuant to the terms of 8a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for wages and working 9conditions.AB367,2,1210(2) The department shall also exempt an individual described in sub. (1) from 11the application of rules promulgated under s. 103.02 or 104.09 that require 12employers to keep records of the hours of employment and wages of employees.AB367,213Section 2. 104.01 (2) (b) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB367,2,1714104.01 (2) (b) 6. Any individual who has entered into a contract to play 15baseball at the minor league level and who is compensated pursuant to the terms of 16a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for wages and working 17conditions.AB367,318Section 3. 104.09 of the statutes is amended to read:AB367,3,719104.09 Records. Each employer shall keep a record of the names and 20addresses of all student learners and employees, the hours of employment and 1wages of each, and such other records pertaining to ability as the department 2requires, except that an employer is not required to keep a record of the hours of 3employment of an individual who is exempt under ss. 103.023 and 104.01 (2) (b) 6. 4or of any other employee who is exempt under rules promulgated by the department 5from the requirement under s. 103.02 that an employee be paid overtime 6compensation, as defined in s. 103.025 (1) (c), and who is not compensated on an 7hourly rate basis.AB367,3,88